Indiana, session 2026, HB1250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 11-10-12-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) The following definitions
apply throughout this section:
(1) "Receiving county" means the county to which the
department will transport, or arrange for the transportation
of, a serious violent felon upon the serious violent felon's:
(A) release on probation or parole; or
(B) discharge.
(2) "Receiving municipality" means the municipality to which
the department will transport, or arrange for the
transportation of, a serious violent felon upon the serious
violent felon's:
(A) release on probation or parole; or
(B) discharge.
(3) "Serious violent felon" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-47-4-5.
(b) At least seven (7) days before the department:
(1) releases:
(A) a serious violent felon; or
(B) a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for an offense that
would be a serious violent felony (as defined in
HEA 1250 — Concur

2
IC 35-47-4-5(b);
on probation or parole; or
(2) discharges:
(A) a serious violent felon; or
(B) a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for an offense that
would be a serious violent felony (as defined in
IC 35-47-4-5(b);
the department shall electronically notify the persons described in
subsection (c) of the serious violent felon's impending release or
discharge. In addition, the department shall notify any registered
crime victim of the serious violent felon's release or discharge
through the automated victim notification system under
IC 11-8-7-2.
(c) In accordance with subsection (b), the department shall
electronically notify the following officials of a serious violent
felon's impending release or discharge or the impending release or
discharge of a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for an offense that
would be a serious violent felony (as defined in IC 35-47-4-5(b):
(1) The sheriff of the:
(A) receiving county; and
(B) county where the offense was committed.
(2) The prosecuting attorney exercising jurisdiction in the:
(A) receiving county; and
(B) county where the offense was committed.
(3) The chief of police of the:
(A) receiving municipality; and
(B) municipality where the offense was committed.
SECTION 2. IC 35-38-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.168-2014,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "victim
representative" means a person designated by a sentencing court who
is:
(1) a spouse, parent, child, sibling, or other relative of; or
(2) a person who has had a close personal relationship with;
the victim of a felony who is deceased, incapacitated, or less than
eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) Upon entering a conviction, the court shall set a date for
sentencing within thirty (30) days, unless for good cause shown an
extension is granted. If a presentence report is not required, the court
may sentence the defendant at the time the judgment of conviction is
entered. However, the court may not pronounce sentence at that time
without:
HEA 1250 — Concur

3
(1) inquiring as to whether an adjournment is desired by the
defendant; and
(2) informing the victim, if present, of a victim's right to make a
statement concerning the crime and the sentence; and
(3) informing the victim, if present, of the automated victim
notification system established under IC 11-8-7-2, as required
by section 4.5 of this chapter.
When an adjournment is requested, the defendant shall state its purpose
and the court may allow a reasonable time for adjournment.
(c) If:
(1) the state in the manner prescribed by IC 35-34-1-2.5 sought an
increased penalty by alleging that the person was previously
convicted of the offense; and
(2) the person was convicted of the subsequent offense in a jury
trial;
the jury shall reconvene for the sentencing hearing. The person shall be
sentenced to receive the increased penalty if the jury (or the court, if
the trial is to the court alone) finds that the state has proved beyond a
reasonable doubt that the person had a previous conviction for the
offense.
(d) If the felony is nonsuspendible under IC 35-50-2-2 (before its
repeal) or IC 35-50-2-2.2, the judge shall order the defendant, if the
defendant has previously been released on bail or recognizance, to be
imprisoned in the county or local penal facility pending sentencing.
(e) Upon entering a conviction for a felony, the court shall designate
a victim representative if the victim is deceased, incapacitated, or less
than eighteen (18) years of age.
SECTION 3. IC 35-38-1-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. The court shall inform the victim at sentencing,
if the victim is present, of the automated victim notification system
established under IC 11-8-7-2.
SECTION 4. IC 35-40-5-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. A victim has the right to be informed, upon
request, about the progress of the criminal case involving the
victim.
SECTION 5. IC 35-40-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.244-2019,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A prosecuting attorney or a victim assistance
program shall do the following:
(1) Inform a victim that the victim may be present at all public
HEA 1250 — Concur

4
stages of the criminal justice process to the extent that:
(A) the victim's presence and statements do not interfere with
a defendant's constitutional rights; and
(B) there has not been a court order restricting, limiting, or
prohibiting attendance at the criminal proceedings.
(2) Timely notify a victim of all criminal justice hearings and
proceedings that are scheduled for a criminal matter in which the
victim was involved.
(3) Promptly notify a victim when a criminal court proceeding has
been rescheduled or canceled.
(4) Obtain an interpreter or translator, if necessary, to advise a
victim of the rights granted to a victim under the law.
(5) Coordinate efforts of local law enforcement agencies that are
designed to promptly inform a victim after an offense occurs of
the availability of, and the application process for, community
services for victims and the families of victims, including
information concerning services such as the following:
(A) Victim compensation funds.
(B) Victim assistance resources.
(C) Legal resources.
(D) Mental health services.
(E) Social services.
(F) Health resources.
(G) Rehabilitative services.
(H) Financial assistance services.
(I) Crisis intervention services.
(J) Transportation and child care services to promote the
participation of a victim or a member of the victim's
immediate family in the criminal proceedings.
(6) Inform the victim that the court may order a defendant
convicted of the offense involving the victim to pay restitution to
the victim under IC 35-50-5-3.
(7) Upon request of the victim, inform the victim of the terms and
conditions of release of the person accused of committing a crime
against the victim.
(8) Upon request of the victim, give the victim notice of the
criminal offense for which:
(A) the defendant accused of committing the offense against
the victim was convicted or acquitted; or
(B) the charges were dismissed against the defendant accused
of committing the offense against the victim.
(9) In a county having a victim-offender reconciliation program
HEA 1250 — Concur

5
(VORP), provide an opportunity for a victim, if the accused
person or the offender agrees, to:
(A) meet with the accused person or the offender in a safe,
controlled environment;
(B) give to the accused person or the offender, either orally or
in writing, a summary of the financial, emotional, and physical
effects of the offense on the victim and the victim's family; and
(C) negotiate a restitution agreement to be submitted to the
sentencing court for damages incurred by the victim as a result
of the offense.
(10) Assist a victim in preparing verified documentation
necessary to obtain a restitution order under IC 35-50-5-3.
(11) Inform a victim (or the spouse or an immediate family
member of a deceased victim) of the victim's right to a copy of the
trial transcript, and assist the victim, spouse, or immediate family
member in obtaining a transcript as described in IC 35-40-5-8.5.
(12) Advise a victim of other rights granted to a victim under the
law.
(13) Assist a local law enforcement authority in notifying a victim
(or the spouse or an immediate family member of a deceased
victim) under IC 11-8-8-23 of an offender's name change.
(14) Inform a victim in writing of the automated victim
notification system established under IC 11-8-7-2.
SECTION 6. IC 36-8-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2023,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A unit may establish, maintain, and operate
a police and law enforcement system to preserve public peace and
order and may provide facilities, equipment, and supplies for that
system.
(b) Before hiring a person as a law enforcement officer, including
a police reserve officer described in IC 36-8-3-20, the hiring
department or agency shall contact every law enforcement department
or agency that has employed (or that currently employs) the applicant
and request that the employing department or agency provide:
(1) a complete and unredacted copy of all findings and orders
documents related to disciplinary action or internal investigations
(whether performed by an internal investigator or an outside
agency) involving the officer; and
(2) the hiring department or agency with a copy of the applicant's
entire employment file, except for any medical records or
information.
(c) An agency or department that receives a request under
HEA 1250 — Concur

6
subsection (b) or under IC 5-2-24-2 shall:
(1) comply with the request not later than ten (10) business days
from receipt of the request; and
(2) upon request of the applicant, provide the applicant with a
copy of the information provided to the hiring department or
agency.
No covenant, promise, or agreement to refrain from disclosure of the
information described in subsection (b) prevents compliance with the
requirements imposed by this section. An agency or department acting
in good faith is immune from civil and criminal liability for complying
with this subsection.
HEA 1250 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1250 — Concur